Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-6026
Rules and regulations.

The director may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the Insurers and Health Organizations Risk-Based Capital Act.

Laws 1993, LB 583, § 38;

Laws 1994, LB 978, § 48;

Laws 1999, LB 258, § 32.